Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.38.010

Out-of-state bank may engage in banking in this state—Conditions—Director's approval of interstate combination.

(1) An out-of-state bank may engage in banking in this state without violating RCW 30A.04.280 only if the conditions and filing requirements of this chapter are met and the bank was lawfully engaged in banking in this state on July 22, 2010, or the bank's in-state banking activities:

(a) Resulted from an interstate combination pursuant to RCW 30A.49.125 or 32.32.500;

(b) Resulted from a relocation of a head office of a state bank pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 30 and RCW 30A.04.215(3);

(c) Resulted from a relocation of a main office of a national bank pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 30;

(d) Resulted from the establishment of a branch of a savings bank in compliance with RCW 32.04.030(6); or

(e) Resulted from interstate branching under RCW 30A.38.015.

Nothing in this section affects the authorities of alien banks as defined by RCW 30A.42.020 to engage in banking within this state.

(2) The director, consistent with 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(D), may approve an interstate combination if the standard on which the approval is based does not discriminate against out-of-state banks, out-of-state bank holding companies, or subsidiaries of those banks or holding companies.

[ 2014 c 37 s 208; 2013 c 76 s 12; 2005 c 348 s 2; 1996 c 2 s 11. Formerly RCW 30.38.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 348: See note following RCW 30A.38.005.